Florida, session 2026, SB866.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 456.63, Florida Statutes, is created to 17 read: 18 456.63âContinuing education on maternal mental health.â 19 (1)âContinuing education hours required for licensure 20 renewal for health care practitioners must include all of the 21 following: 22 (a)âThe best practices in screening for maternal mental 23 health disorders. 24 (b)âThe range of maternal mental health disorders. 25 (c)âThe range of evidence-based treatment options, 26 including the importance of allowing a mother to be involved in 27 developing a treatment plan. 28 (d)âWhen an obstetrician or a primary care physician should 29 consult with a psychiatrist versus making a referral. 30 (2)âA board, or the department if there is no board, shall: 31 (a)âPeriodically update any curriculum developed pursuant 32 to subsection (1) to account for new research. 33 (b)âAccept the successful completion of the curriculum 34 under subsection (1) as credit toward the continuing education 35 requirements for renewal of a license by a health care 36 practitioner who practices in the specialty of: 37 1.âPediatrics; 38 2.âObstetrics and gynecology; 39 3.âPsychiatry; or 40 4.âClinical psychology. 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.